test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NAD_VINIT_iitaawis_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisensimishiniibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisensimishiniibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisensimishiniibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giiitaawisensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giiitaawisensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giiitaawisensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisensimishiniibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisensimishiniibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisensimishiniibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oiitaawisensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oiitaawisensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oiitaawisensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3iitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisenhimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisenhimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisenhimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisenhimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisenhimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisenhimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisenhimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisenhimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisenhimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisensimishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisensimishinaanibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisensimishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisensimishiniibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisensimishiniibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisensimishiniibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: iiitaawisensimishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: iiitaawisensimishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: iiitaawisensimishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: iiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: iiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefiitaawis+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: iiitaawisensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
